Nebraska, session 109, LB397.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 44-3,158, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-3,158 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Assigned risk employer means a Nebraska employer that is in good faith
entitled to, but is unable to obtain, workers' compensation insurance through
ordinary methods; and
(b) Director means the Director of Insurance.
(2)(a) The director shall enter into an agreement with one or more
workers' compensation insurers to provide workers' compensation insurance to
assigned risk employers. In selecting an insurer to become an assigned risk
insurer, the director shall consider the cost of coverage to assigned risk
employers, the loss control and claims handling services available from the
workers' compensation insurer, the financial condition of the workers'
compensation insurer, and any other relevant factors. An agreement entered into
under this subsection may not exceed five years.
(b) If the director determines that the cost of workers' compensation
insurance premiums for an insurer to provide assigned risk coverage pursuant to
such an agreement would be unreasonably high, the director may enter into an
agreement in which the assigned risk insurer covers a portion of the losses
incurred by the assigned risk employer. Any agreement that involves an average
rate level of less than two and one-half times the prospective loss costs
approved for an advisory organization pursuant to section 44-7511 shall not be
considered unreasonably high for the purposes of this section. Pursuant to any
such agreement, remaining losses shall be assessed against all workers'
compensation insurers writing workers' compensation insurance in this state and
risk management pools created under the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act
based on their workers' compensation premiums written in this state or
contributions made to risk management pools. Assigned risk premiums shall be
excluded from the basis for such assessments.
(c) If the assigned risk system described in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b)
of this section ceases to be viable because no qualified insurer is willing to
provide workers' compensation coverage at an average rate level of two and one-
half times the prospective loss costs approved for an advisory organization
pursuant to section 44-7511 without also requiring substantial sharing of
losses with all other workers' compensation insurers writing workers'
compensation insurance in this state and risk management pools created under
the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act, then the director may, after
consultation with insurers authorized to issue workers' compensation insurance
policies in this state, create a reasonable alternative assigned risk system
involving the sharing of premiums and losses for assigned risk employers among
all such workers' compensation insurers writing workers' compensation insurance
in this state and such risk management pools. If established, such alternative
assigned risk system shall not utilize an average rate level of less than two
and one-half times the prospective loss costs approved for an advisory
organization pursuant to section 44-7511.
(3) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section.
(4) An employer shall not be considered to be in good faith entitled to be
covered by workers' compensation insurance under this section if:
(a) The employer is required to establish a safety committee pursuant to
sections 48-443 to 48-445 and is not in compliance with such sections;
(a) (b) The employer is in default on workers' compensation premiums;
(b) (c) The employer has failed to reimburse an insurer for amounts to be
repaid pursuant to workers' compensation insurance written on a policy with a
deductible;
(c) (d) The employer has failed to provide an insurer reasonable access to
books and records necessary for a premium audit;
(d) (e) The employer has defrauded or attempted to defraud an insurer; or
(e) (f) The employer is found to have been owned or controlled by persons
who owned or controlled a prior employer that is or would be ineligible for
coverage pursuant to subdivisions (4)(a) (4)(b) through (d) (e) of this
section.
Sec. 2. Section 48-144.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-144.03 (1) Notwithstanding policy provisions that stipulate a workers'
-1-

LB397 LB397
2026 2026
compensation insurance policy to be a contract with a fixed term of coverage
that expires at the end of the term, coverage under a workers' compensation
insurance policy shall continue in full force and effect until notice is given
in accordance with this section.
(2) No cancellation of a workers' compensation insurance policy within the
policy period shall be effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by
the workers' compensation insurer to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court
and to the employer. No such cancellation shall be effective until thirty days
after the giving of such notices, except that the cancellation may be effective
ten days after the giving of such notices if such cancellation is based on (a)
notice from the employer to the insurer to cancel the policy, (b) nonpayment of
premium due the insurer under any policy written by the insurer for the
employer, (c) failure of the employer to reimburse deductible losses as
required under any policy written by the insurer for the employer, or (d)
failure of the employer, if covered pursuant to section 44-3,158, to comply
with sections 48-443 to 48-445.
(3) No workers' compensation insurance policy shall expire or lapse at the
end of the policy period unless notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers'
compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the employer. No workers'
compensation insurance policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after the
giving of such notices, except that a policy may expire or lapse ten days after
the giving of such notices if the nonrenewal is based on (a) notice from the
employer to the insurer to not renew the policy, (b) nonpayment of premium due
the insurer under any policy written by the insurer for the employer, (c)
failure of the employer to reimburse deductible losses as required under any
policy written by the insurer for the employer, or (d) failure of the employer,
if covered pursuant to section 44-3,158, to comply with sections 48-443 to
48-445.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section terminate on January 1, 2012.
Subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section apply beginning on January 1,
2012.
(2)(a) (5)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation policies
other than master policies or multiple coordinated policies obtained by a
professional employer organization.
(b) No cancellation of a policy within the policy period shall be
effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers'
compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the employer. No such
cancellation shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices,
except that the cancellation may be effective ten days after the giving of such
notices if such cancellation is based on (i) notice from the employer to the
insurer to cancel the policy, (ii) nonpayment of premium due the insurer under
any policy written by the insurer for the employer, or (iii) failure of the
employer to reimburse deductible losses as required under any policy written by
the insurer for the employer , or (iv) failure of the employer, if covered
pursuant to section 44-3,158, to comply with sections 48-443 to 48-445.
(c) No policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period unless
notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the
compensation court and to the employer. No policy shall expire or lapse until
thirty days after giving such notices, except that a policy may expire or lapse
ten days after the giving of such notices if the nonrenewal is based on (i)
notice from the employer to the insurer to not renew the policy, (ii)
nonpayment of premium due the insurer under any policy written by the insurer
for the employer, or (iii) failure of the employer to reimburse deductible
losses as required under any policy written by the insurer for the employer ,
or (iv) failure of the employer, if covered pursuant to section 44-3,158, to
comply with sections 48-443 to 48-445.
(3)(a) (6)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation master
policies obtained by a professional employer organization.
(b) No cancellation of a master policy within the policy period shall be
effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers'
compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the professional employer
organization. No such cancellation shall be effective until thirty days after
giving such notices.
(c) No termination of coverage for a client or any employees of a client
under a master policy within the policy period shall be effective unless notice
is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to
the professional employer organization. No such termination of coverage shall
be effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the
termination of coverage may be effective ten days after the giving of such
notices if such termination is based on (i) notice from the client to the
professional employer organization or the insurer to terminate the coverage or
(ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's
nonpayment of premium.
(d) No master policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period
unless notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to
the compensation court and to the professional employer organization. No master
policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after giving such notices.
(e) Notice of the cancellation or nonrenewal of a master policy or the
termination of coverage for a client or the employees of a client under such a
policy shall be given by the professional employer organization to the client
within fifteen days after the cancellation, nonrenewal, or termination unless
replacement coverage has been obtained.
(4)(a) (7)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation multiple
-2-

LB397 LB397
2026 2026
coordinated policies obtained by a professional employer organization.
(b) No cancellation of a policy within the policy period shall be
effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers'
compensation insurer to the compensation court, to the professional employer
organization, and to the client employer. No such cancellation shall be
effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the
cancellation may be effective ten days after giving such notices if such
cancellation is based on (i) notice from the client to the professional
employer organization or the insurer to cancel the policy, (ii) notice from the
professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment of premium or
failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section
48-146.03, (iii) failure of the client, if covered pursuant to section
44-3,158, to comply with sections 48-443 to 48-445, or (iii) (iv) for policies
issued pursuant to section 44-3,158, nonpayment of premium or failure to
reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03.
(c) No termination of coverage for any employees of the client during the
policy period shall be effective unless notice is given by the workers'
compensation insurer to the compensation court, to the professional employer
organization, and to the client. No such termination of coverage shall be
effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the
termination of coverage may be effective ten days after the giving of such
notices if such termination is based on (i) notice from the client to the
professional employer organization or the insurer to terminate the coverage or
(ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's
nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued
pursuant to section 48-146.03.
(d) No policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period unless
notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the
compensation court, to the professional employer organization, and to the
client. No policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after giving such
notices, except that a policy may expire or lapse ten days after the giving of
such notices if the nonrenewal is based on (i) notice from the client to the
professional employer organization or the insurer to not renew the policy, (ii)
notice from the professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment
of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to
section 48-146.03, (iii) failure of the client, if covered pursuant to section
44-3,158, to comply with sections 48-443 to 48-445, or (iii) (iv) for policies
issued pursuant to section 44-3,158, nonpayment of premium or failure to
reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03.
(e) An insurer may refrain from sending notices required by this
subsection to a professional employer organization's client based upon the
professional employer organization's representation that coverage has been or
will be replaced. Such representation shall not absolve the insurer of its
responsibility to continue coverage if such representation proves inaccurate.
(5) (8) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, if replacement
workers' compensation insurance coverage has been secured with another workers'
compensation insurer, then the cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy or the
termination of coverage for a client or employees of a client under the policy
shall be effective as of the effective date of such other insurance coverage.
(6) (9) The notices required by this section shall state the reason for
the cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy or termination of coverage for a
client or employees of a client under a policy.
(7) (10) The notices required by this section shall be provided in writing
and shall be deemed given upon the mailing of such notices by certified mail,
except that notices from insurers to the compensation court may be provided by
electronic means if such electronic means is approved by the administrator of
the compensation court. If notice is provided by electronic means pursuant to
such an approval, it shall be deemed given upon receipt and acceptance by the
compensation court.
Sec. 3. Section 48-443, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-443 (1) Every (1)(a) Not later than January 1, 1994, every public and
private employer subject to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall
establish a safety committee. Such committee shall adopt and maintain an
effective written injury prevention program.
(b) A client of a professional employer organization is not relieved of
its obligation to establish a safety committee based on its workers being co-
employees of the professional employer organization. A professional employer
agreement shall not allocate the client's responsibility to establish a safety
committee to the professional employer organization. For purposes of this
subdivision, the terms client, professional employer organization, and
professional employer agreement shall have the same meaning as in section
48-2702. This subdivision becomes operative on January 1, 2012.
(2)(a) For public employers subject to collective-bargaining agreements,
the establishment of the safety committee may shall be accomplished through the
collective-bargaining process.
(b) For public employers not subject to collective-bargaining agreements,
the safety committee shall be composed of an equal number of members
representing employees and the employer. Employee members shall not be selected
by the employer but shall be selected pursuant to procedures prescribed in
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor.
(c) The cost of maintaining and operating the safety committee shall be
minimal to the public employer.
-3-

LB397 LB397
2026 2026
(3) A public An employer shall compensate employee members of the safety
committee at their regular hourly wage plus their regular benefits while the
employees are attending committee meetings or otherwise engaged in committee
duties.
(4) An employee shall not be discharged or discriminated against by his or
her employer because he or she makes any oral or written complaint to the
safety committee or any governmental agency having regulatory responsibility
for occupational safety and health, and any employee so discharged or
discriminated against shall be reinstated and shall receive reimbursement for
lost wages and work benefits caused by the employer's action.
Sec. 4. Section 48-446, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-446 (1) There is hereby created the Workplace Safety Consultation
Program. It is the intent of the Legislature that such program help provide
employees in Nebraska with safe and healthful workplaces.
(2) Under the Workplace Safety Consultation Program, the Department of
Labor may conduct workplace inspections and consultations to determine whether
employers are complying with standards issued by the federal Occupational
Safety and Health Administration or the federal Mine Safety and Health
Administration for safe and healthful workplaces. Workplace inspections and
safety consultations shall be performed by employees of the Department of Labor
who are knowledgeable and experienced in the occupational safety and health
field and who are trained in the federal standards and in the recognition of
safety and health hazards. The Department of Labor may employ qualified persons
as may be necessary to carry out this section.
(3) All employers shall be subject to occupational safety and health
inspections covering their Nebraska operations. Employers shall be selected by
the Commissioner of Labor for inspection on the basis of factors intended to
identify the likelihood of workplace injuries and to achieve the most efficient
utilization of safety personnel of the Department of Labor. Such factors shall
include:
(a) The amount of premium paid by the employer for workers' compensation
insurance;
(b) The experience modification produced by the experience rating system
referenced in section 44-7524;
(c) Whether the employer is covered by workers' compensation insurance
under section 44-3,158;
(d) The relative hazard of the employer's type of business as evidenced by
insurance rates or loss costs filed with the Director of Insurance for the
insurance rating classification or classifications applicable to the employer;
(e) The nature, type, or frequency of accidents for the employer as may be
reported to the Department of Insurance, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court, or the Department of Labor;
(f) Workplace hazards as may be reported to the Department of Insurance,
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, or the Department of Labor;
(g) Previous safety and health history;
(h) Possible employee exposure to toxic substances;
(i) Requests by employers for the Department of Labor to inspect their
workplaces or otherwise provide consulting services on a basis by which the
employer will reimburse the Department of Labor; and
(j) All other relevant factors.
(4) Hazards identified by an inspection shall be eliminated within a
reasonable time as specified by the Commissioner of Labor.
(5) An employer who refuses to eliminate workplace hazards in compliance
with an inspection shall be referred to the federal Occupational Safety and
Health Administration or the federal Mine Safety and Health Administration for
enforcement.
(6) At the discretion of the Commissioner of Labor, inspection of an
employer may be repeated to ensure compliance by the employer, with the
expenses incurred by the Department of Labor to be paid by the employer.
(7) The Commissioner of Labor shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations establishing a schedule of fees for consultations and inspections.
Such fees shall be established with due regard for the costs of administering
the Workplace Safety Consultation Program. The cost of consultations and
inspections shall be borne by each employer for which these services are
rendered.
(8) There is hereby created the Workplace Safety Consultation Program Cash
Fund. The fund terminates on the effective date of this act, and the State
Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the General
Fund. All fees collected pursuant to the Workplace Safety Consultation Program
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund and shall be
used for the sole purpose of administering the program. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(9) Each employer provided a consultation or inspection by the Department
of Labor shall retain up-to-date records for each place of employment as
recommended by the inspection or consultation. The employer shall make such
records available to the Department of Labor upon request to ensure continued
progress of the employer's efforts to comply with the federal Occupational
Safety and Health Administration or the federal Mine Safety and Health
Administration standards.
(10) Any person who knowingly operates or causes to be operated a business
-4-

LB397 LB397
2026 2026
in violation of recommendations to correct serious or imminent hazards as
identified by the Workplace Safety Consultation Program shall be referred to
the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration or the federal Mine
Safety and Health Administration.
(11) The Attorney General, acting on behalf of the Commissioner of Labor,
or the county attorney in a county in which a business is located or operated
may apply to the district court for an order against any employer in violation
of this section.
(12) The Workplace Safety Consultation Program shall not be construed to
alter the duty of care or the liability of an owner or a business for injuries
or death of any person or damage to any property. The state and its officers
and employees shall not be construed to assume liability arising out of an
accident involving a business by reason of administration of the Workplace
Safety Consultation Program.
(13) Inspectors employed by the Department of Labor may inspect any place
of employment with or without notice during normal hours of operation. Such
inspectors may suspend the operation of equipment determined to constitute an
imminent danger situation. Operation of such equipment shall not resume until
the hazardous or unsafe condition is corrected to the satisfaction of the
inspector.
(14) No person with a reasonable cause to believe the truth of the
information shall be subject to civil liability for libel, slander, or any
other relevant tort cause of action by virtue of providing information without
malice on workplace hazards or the nature, type, or frequency of accidents to
the Department of Insurance, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, or the
Department of Labor.
(15) Safety and health inspectors employed by the Department of Labor
shall have the right and power to enter any premise, building, or structure,
public or private, for the purpose of inspecting any work area or equipment. A
refusal by the employer of entry by a safety and health inspector employed by
the Department of Labor shall be a violation of this subsection. If the
Commissioner of Labor finds, after notice and hearing, that an employer has
violated this subsection, he or she may order payment of a civil penalty of not
more than one thousand dollars for each violation. Each day of continued
violation shall constitute a separate violation.
(16) The Commissioner of Labor shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Original sections 44-3,158, 48-144.03, 48-443, and 48-446,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 6. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 48-444 and
48-445, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-5-